California, session 20252026, AB478.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares the following:(a) During evacuations, many animals are left behind due to a variety of reasons, including owners not being at home at the time the evacuation order is given, lack of equipment needed to evacuate their animals, or difficulty in capturing them in time.(b) While animals are legally categorized as property, most people view them as family members and, as such, are determined to save them.(c) During the recent fires in Southern California, some jurisdictions lacked a coordinated procedure or central authority to facilitate animal rescues, leaving volunteers and rescue groups to respond to pet owners’ pleas to return to their residences, often by gaining access through unofficial means.(d) The Pets Evacuation and Transportation Standards (PETS) Act of 2006 was passed at the federal level, which requires state and local emergency plans to account for the needs of pets and service animals during disasters.(e) The Legislature has taken steps to protect pets and their guardians in disasters, including by passing Assembly Bill 1648 of the 2021–22 Regular Session of the Legislature, which mandates that all kennel permitholders submit evacuation plans as a condition of the permit, and Assembly Bill 781 of the 2023–24 Regular Session of the Legislature, which requires emergency plans to include at least one animal-friendly shelter.SEC. 2. Section 8593.11 is added to the Government Code, to read:8593.11. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Evacuation order” means an order from the Governor, or a county emergency management official, county sheriff, chief of police, or fire marshal, under which persons subject to the order are required to relocate outside of the geographic area covered by the order due to an imminent danger resulting from a state or local emergency.(2) “Pet” means an animal, including a dog, cat, rabbit, rodent, reptile, amphibian, fish, bird, or other species of animal, kept for the purpose of being a household pet.(b) Upon the next update of a city’s or county’s emergency plan:(1) (A) (i) A city or county shall update its emergency plan to designate procedures for the rescue of a pet from an area subject to an evacuation order, subject to approval by the incident commander in coordination with the emergency management authority, that at the time of the evacuation the pet’s owner believed to be alive.(ii) The procedures shall establish timelines or conditions in which rescues can occur as safely as possible.(B) A city or county may require a person with a residence in an area subject to an evacuation order or their designated representative to sign a liability waiver releasing the city or county from any liabilities or claims related to the person’s return to the residence in accordance with the procedures required by subparagraph (A).(C) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to grant any person the absolute right to reenter an evacuation zone. All reentry shall be subject to incident conditions and approval by the designated incident commander in coordination with the emergency management authority.(2) A city or county shall update its emergency plan to designate a person or entity for a person with a residence in an area subject to an evacuation order or their designated representative to call if the person is in need of information regarding evacuating pets during an evacuation.(c) A city or county shall make available to the public by posting on its internet website information, including, but not limited to:(1) Contact information for the person or entity designated to provide information regarding evacuating pets during an evacuation in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(2) Resources for persons who need assistance reuniting with pets rescued from areas subject to evacuation orders, including a list of animals rescued from the evacuated areas that is linked on the home page of the city’s or county’s internet website.(3) Multimodal methods of providing information regarding pet rescues and resources specified in paragraph (2).SEC. 3. Section 53074.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:53074.1. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Evacuation order” means an order from the Governor, or a county emergency management official, county sheriff, chief of police, or fire marshal, under which persons subject to the order are required to relocate outside of the geographic area covered by the order due to an imminent danger resulting from a declared federal or state emergency.(2) “Pet” means an animal, including a dog, cat, rabbit, rodent, reptile, amphibian, fish, bird, or other species of animal, kept for the purpose of being a household pet.(b) (1) A pet rescued or originating from an area subject to an evacuation order, that would otherwise be eligible for adoption, shall not be made available for adoption, euthanized, or transferred out of the custody of the local animal control agency or its in-state partner animal shelters, animal rescues, or animal fosters for at least 30 days.(2) A local animal control agency may transfer a pet to an in-state partner animal shelter, animal rescue, or animal foster during the 30-day period if the local animal control agency maintains records of the location of the pet in order to facilitate owner reunification. (3) After the 30-day period has passed, a pet described in paragraph (1) shall not be euthanized if an animal rescue organization has previously notified the local animal control agency of their willingness to take custody of the pet and completes that transfer upon the conclusion of the 30-day period.(c) This section does not apply to a pet that is irremediably suffering, or a pet that was relinquished or surrendered by its owner.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.